Maryland, session 2025, HB0141.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on Loneliness and Isolation.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Human Services, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Deputy Secretary for Behavioral Health, or the Deputy Secretary’s
designee; and
(5) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) two representatives of an alliance of private and public entities
in the State that recognize the importance of, and need for, addressing loneliness and social
disconnectedness among residents of all ages across the State;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0141*

HOUSE BILL 141
(ii) one dining hall manager of a soup kitchen in a suburban area of
the State;
(iii) one high school teacher in the State;
(iv) three students attending a high school in the State, of whom:
1. one shall be a student who identifies as a member of the
LGBTQIA+ community;
2. one shall be a student who identifies as female; and
3. one shall be a student who identifies as male;
(v) one student who is enrolled in a school of public health at an
institution of higher education in the State;
(vi) one student who is enrolled in a school of social work at an
institution of higher education in the State;
(vii) one resident of an assisted living facility for veterans in the
State;
(viii) one resident of an assisted living facility located in a suburban
town of the State;
(ix) one administrator of a senior center in the State;
(x) one librarian from a library in an urban area of the State;
(xi) one librarian from a library in a rural area of the State;
(xii) one representative of an organization that serves children in an
urban area of the State;
(xiii) one representative of an organization that represents
municipalities in the State;
(xiv) one representative of an organization that represents small
towns in the State;
(xv) one representative of an organization in the State that is working
on policies to improve planning and zoning laws to create an inclusive society and improve
access to transit–oriented development in the State;

HOUSE BILL 141 3
(xvi) one representative of an organization in the State that is working
to improve and create more walkable and accessible main streets in towns and
municipalities in the State;
(xvii) one representative of an organization in the State that advocates
for individuals with a physical disability;
(xviii) one individual who is an expert in digital health and identifying
safe digital education;
(xix) one representative of an organization in the State that develops
mobile applications that are intended to address loneliness and isolation;
(xx) one representative of an organization that is exploring the use of
technology to address loneliness and isolation;
(xxi) one psychiatrist who treats adolescents in the State;
(xxii) one psychiatrist who treats adults in the State; and
(xxiii) one social worker who practices in an urban area of the State.
(c) The members of the Task Force shall elect cochairs of the Task Force from
among the members of the Task Force.
(d) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) evaluate the causes of and other factors contributing to the sense of
loneliness and isolation experienced by individuals in the State;
(2) evaluate methods of preventing and eliminating the sense of isolation
and loneliness experienced by individuals in the State;
(3) recommend local activities, systems, and structures to combat isolation
and loneliness in the State, including opportunities for organizing or enhancing in–person
gatherings within communities, especially for individuals who have been living in isolation
for extended periods of time; and

HOUSE BILL 141
(4) make recommendations regarding the possibility of creating
municipal–based social connection committees to address the challenges of and potential
solutions for combatting isolation and loneliness experienced by individuals in the State.
(g) On or before June 30, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, to the Senate Finance Committee and the House Health and
Government Operations Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.